lexd_components/hyx-nouns_paradigms.lexd
#Plural possessive (separate line for instrumental)
#I manually add the ն for singular forms before the plural possessive
#մուկերնիս
NounIrregMonoNerOld NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0|NPlReg  PluralPossessiveDeclension

#մկերնիս
NounIrregMonoNerOld NZero NouNinflBoundaryRed NSg0|NPlReg  PluralPossessiveDeclension   # Dir/LR

#մուկներնիս, I have to force -er 
NounIrregMonoNerOld NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 PossPlWithSpuriousNer CaseRegPostPluralPoss? Def|Poss  # Dir/LR
NounIrregMonoNerOld NZero NouNinflBoundary NPlNerOnly  PossPl CaseRegPostPluralPoss? Def|Poss  # Dir/LR
NounIrregMonoNerOld NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0|NPlNerOnly  InsReg PossPl  Def|Poss   # Dir/LR

#մկներնիս
NounIrregMonoNerOld NZero NouNinflBoundaryRedForcedNer  NSg0 PossPlWithSpuriousNer CaseRegPostPluralPoss? Def|Poss  # Dir/LR
NounIrregMonoNerOld NZero NouNinflBoundaryRedForcedNer  NPlNerOnly  PossPl CaseRegPostPluralPoss? Def|Poss  # Dir/LR
NounIrregMonoNerOld NZero NouNinflBoundaryRedForcedNer NSg0|NPlNerOnly  InsReg PossPl  Def|Poss   # Dir/LR


#For nouns which take ներ both prescriptively and in practice
#It's just լեռ
#Singular լեռէ լեռնէ
NounIrregMonoNerStill NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 CaseRegI? (Def|Poss)?
NounIrregMonoNerStill NZero NouNinflBoundary NominalNasalN NSg0 CaseRegI (Def|Poss)?  # Dir/LR

NounIrregMonoNerStill NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 AttributiveGenIDef|AttributiveInst
NounIrregMonoNerStill NZero NouNinflBoundary NominalNasalN NSg0 AttributiveGenIDef|AttributiveInst  # Dir/LR

#Plural
NounIrregMonoNerStill NZero NouNinflBoundary NPlNerOnly CaseDefUDeclension

#Plural possessive (separate line for instrumental)
#I manually add the ն for singular forms before the plural possessive
# Have to force եր inside the singular
NounIrregMonoNerStill NZero NouNinflBoundary  NSg0 PossPlWithSpuriousNer CaseRegPostPluralPoss? Def|Poss 
NounIrregMonoNerStill NZero NouNinflBoundary NPlNerOnly  PossPl CaseRegPostPluralPoss? Def|Poss 
NounIrregMonoNerStill NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0|NPlNerOnly  InsReg PossPl  Def|Poss 


################################
################################
################################
################################
#Suffixal irregulars

PATTERN NounDeclUtjunSuffix
#paradigm of suffix ութիւն
#Singular caseless
NounUtjunSuffix NUtjunSuffix NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 (Def|Poss)?  
#Singular archaic case
NounUtjunSuffix NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 CaseUtjunArchaicDat|CaseUtjunArchaicAbl|CaseUtjunArchaicInst (Def|Poss)? 
#Singular regular case
NounUtjunSuffix NUtjunSuffix NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 CaseRegI (Def|Poss)?    # Dir/LR

#Plural 
NounUtjunSuffix NUtjunSuffix  NZero NouNinflBoundary NPlReg CaseRegU? (Def|Poss)? 
#Archaic -ութեանց for plural genitive/dat
NounUtjunSuffix NZero NouNinflBoundary CaseUtjunArchaicPlural   # Dir/LR
#Plural possessive (separate line for instrumental)
NounUtjunSuffix NUtjunSuffix  NZero	 NouNinflBoundary NSg0|NPlReg  PluralPossessiveDeclension


#attributive, arak included թեանիս
NounUtjunSuffix  NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 AttributiveUtjun
NounUtjunSuffix NUtjunSuffix  NZero NouNinflBoundary NPlReg AttributiveGenUDef|AttributiveInst

PATTERN NounDeclUmSuffix
#pattern for suffix ում

#Singular caseless
NounUmSuffix NUmSuffixBase NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 (Def|Poss)? 
#Singular archaic case
NounUmSuffix NUmSuffixReduced NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 DatGenArchaicAn (Def|Poss)? 
#Singular regular case
NounUmSuffix NUmSuffixBase NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 DatGenRegI (Def|Poss)?   # Dir/LR
NounUmSuffix NUmSuffixBase NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 CaseRegOblique (Def|Poss)?  
#Singular archaic oblique cases like ուսմանէ ուսմամբ
NounUmSuffix NUmSuffixReduced NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 DatGenArchaicAn CaseRegOblique (Def|Poss)? # Dir/LR
NounUmSuffix NUmSuffixReduced NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 InstArchaicAmp (Def|Poss)? # Dir/LR



#Plural (already know it's polysyllabic)
NounUmSuffix NUmSuffixBase NZero NouNinflBoundary NPlReg CaseRegU? (Def|Poss)? 

#Plural possessive (separate line for instrumental)
NounUmSuffix NUmSuffixBase  NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0|NPlReg PluralPossessiveDeclension


#attributive,
NounUmSuffix  NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 AttributiveUm 
NounUmSuffix  NZero NouNinflBoundary NPlReg AttributiveUm 


######################
#####################
##### Archaic declensions on nouns

PATTERN NounDeclOldAnForm
#These are nouns which can take -ան in the dative
#The -an form is rather antiquated and with only a few words
#The -an then triggers arbitrary reduction
#My cheat is that this pattern only forms the dative
#The words should have a regular version in the regular list
#So this pattern only derives գարուն գարնան գարնանէ
# can also do unreduced nouns like կողմ կողման կողմանէ
# some can use այ when add indefinite suffx
# Can have ամբ forms in instrumental

NounOldAnForm NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 DatGenArchaicAn (Def|Poss)?  
NounOldAnForm NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 DatGenArchaicAn CaseRegOblique  (Def|Poss)?  # Dir/LR
NounOldAnForm NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 DatGenArchaicAnAj # Dir/LR
NounOldAnForm NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 InstArchaicAmp (Def|Poss)?  # Dir/LR



PATTERN NounDeclOldOch
#These are nouns which can take -ոջ in the dative
#The -ոջ form is rather antiquated and with only a few words
#The -ոջ then triggers arbitrary reduction
#My cheat is to use separate reduced stems
#The obliques optionally take մ
#So this pattern   derives կին կնոջ կնոջմէ կնոջէ and regularizedform

#Singular caseless ընկեր կին
NounDecOldOchNominativeStem NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 (Def|Poss)? 
#Singular archaic case with oblique forms ընկերոջ ընկերոջմէ կնոջ կնոջմէ
NounDecOldOchObliqueStem NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 DatGenArchaicOch (CaseBoundaryM CaseRegOblique)? (Def|Poss)? 
 #without nasal boundary ընկերոջէ կնոջէ
NounDecOldOchObliqueStem NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 DatGenArchaicOch CaseRegOblique (Def|Poss)?  # Dir/LR
#Singular regular case
NounDecOldOchNominativeStem  NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 CaseRegI (Def|Poss)?   # Dir/LR

#Plural 
NounDecOldOchNominativeStem  NZero NouNinflBoundary NPlReg CaseRegU? (Def|Poss)? 

#regularized plural possessive ընկերնիս կիներնիս
NounDecOldOchNominativeStem NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0|NPlReg  PluralPossessiveDeclension
#irregular plural possessive ընկերոջնիս ընկերոջմովնիս ընկերոջովնիս կնոջնիս կնոջմովնիս կնոջոջնիս
NounDecOldOchObliqueStem NZero	 NouNinflBoundary  DatGenArchaicOch PossPl CaseRegPostPluralPoss? Def|Poss  # Dir/LR
NounDecOldOchObliqueStem NZero  NouNinflBoundary  DatGenArchaicOch CaseBoundaryM? InsReg PossPl  Def|Poss  # Dir/LR


#Attributive
NounDecOldOchObliqueStem NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 AttributiveOch
NounDecOldOchNominativeStem  NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 AttributiveGenIDef|AttributiveInst   # Dir/LR
NounDecOldOchNominativeStem  NZero NouNinflBoundary NPlReg AttributiveGenUDef|AttributiveInst



PATTERN NounDecOldOchNominativeStem
#Nominative stems ընկեր կին
NounFamilyOchFixed 
NounFamilyOchBase
PATTERN NounDecOldOchObliqueStem
#Oblique  stems ընկեր կն
NounFamilyOchFixed 
NounFamilyOchReduced


PATTERN NounDeclOldFamilyOAblaut
#These are nouns which can take -օ- in the dative
#The -օ- form is rather antiquated and with only a few words
#The -ոջ then triggers arbitrary reduction
#My cheat is to use separate reduced stems
#The obliques optionally take մ
#So this pattern   derives հայր հօր հօրէ հօրմէ հօրմով and regularizedform

#Singular caseless հայր
NounFamilyOBase NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 (Def|Poss)? 
#Singular archaic case with oblique forms հօր  հօրմէ 
NounFamilyOAblauted NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0  DatGenArchaicEmpty (CaseBoundaryM CaseRegOblique)? (Def|Poss)? 
 #without nasal boundary հօրէ
NounFamilyOAblauted NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 DatGenArchaicEmpty CaseRegOblique (Def|Poss)?   # Dir/LR
#Singular regular case հայրէ
NounFamilyOBase  NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 CaseRegI (Def|Poss)?   # Dir/LR

#Plural հայրեր հայրերուն
NounFamilyOBase  NZero NouNinflBoundary NPlReg CaseRegU? (Def|Poss)? 

#regularized plural possessive եղբայրնիս եղբայրովնիս
NounFamilyOBase NZero	 NouNinflBoundary NSg0|NPlReg  PossPl CaseRegPostPluralPoss? Def|Poss
NounFamilyOBase NZero  NouNinflBoundary NSg0|NPlReg  InsReg PossPl  Def|Poss
#irregular plural possessive եղբօրնիս եղբօրմովնիս եղբօրովնիս
NounFamilyOAblauted NZero	 NouNinflBoundary  DatGenArchaicEmpty PossPl CaseRegPostPluralPoss? Def|Poss  # Dir/LR
NounFamilyOAblauted NZero  NouNinflBoundary  DatGenArchaicEmpty CaseBoundaryM? InsReg PossPl  Def|Poss  # Dir/LR


#attributive, I don't think ablauted stem takes attributive
NounFamilyOBase NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 AttributiveGenIDef|AttributiveInst 
NounFamilyOBase  NZero NouNinflBoundary NPlReg AttributiveGenUDef|AttributiveInst 


PATTERN NounDeclOldRandomOAblaut
# These are nouns which take ablaut -ա- in the dative
# տուն տան
# doesnt take ablaut in oblique տունէ, տնէ

#Singular caseless տուն
NounRandomOBase NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 (Def|Poss)? 
#Singular archaic case  տան
NounRandomOAblauted NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0  DatGenArchaicEmpty   (Def|Poss)? 
#Singular regular case տունէ
NounRandomOBase  NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 DatGenRegI (Def|Poss)?   # Dir/LR
NounRandomOBase  NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 CaseRegOblique (Def|Poss)? 
#Optional reduction
NounRandomOBase  NZero NouNinflBoundaryRed NSg0 CaseRegI (Def|Poss)?   # Dir/LR


#Plural տուներ
NounRandomOBase  NZero NouNinflBoundary NPlReg CaseRegU? (Def|Poss)? 
#regularized plural possessive տուներնիս
NounRandomOBase NZero  NouNinflBoundary NSg0|NPlReg  PossPl CaseRegPostPluralPoss? Def|Poss
NounRandomOBase NZero  NouNinflBoundary NSg0|NPlReg  InsReg PossPl  Def|Poss

#Optional reduction
NounRandomOBase  NZero NouNinflBoundaryRed NPlReg CaseRegU? (Def|Poss)?  # Dir/LR
NounRandomOBase NZero  NouNinflBoundaryRed NSg0|NPlReg  PossPl CaseRegPostPluralPoss? Def|Poss  # Dir/LR
NounRandomOBase NZero  NouNinflBoundaryRed NSg0|NPlReg  InsReg PossPl  Def|Poss  # Dir/LR

#attributive, doesnt take ablaut I think
NounRandomOBase NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 AttributiveGenIDef|AttributiveInst 
NounRandomOBase  NZero NouNinflBoundary NPlReg AttributiveGenUDef|AttributiveInst 



PATTERN NounDeclCountry
# These are country nouns which take -ոյ- reduction in dative
# անգլիա անգլիոյ պոլիս պոլսոյ
# also includes normal countries as separate list NounCountryUnreducible
# Adds toponym feature
# Some locations can be reduced like Էջմիածնի so I added optional red boundary
#Singular caseless անգլիա
NounCountryBase|NounCountryUnreducible  [<np><top>:] NouNinflBoundary NSg0 (Def|Poss)? 
#Singular archaic case  անգլիոյ, must add infl boundary to get glide deletion անգլիոն
NounCountryReduced  [<np><top>:] NouNinflBoundary NSg0 DatGenArchaicOj NouNinflBoundary (Def|Poss)?  
#Singular modern dative case
NounCountryBase  [<np><top>:] NouNinflBoundaryRed|NouNinflBoundary NSg0 DatGenRegI (Def|Poss)?  # Dir/LR
NounCountryUnreducible  [<np><top>:] NouNinflBoundary NSg0 DatGenRegI (Def|Poss)? 
NounCountryUnreducible  [<np><top>:] NouNinflBoundaryRed NSg0 DatGenRegI (Def|Poss)?    # Dir/LR
 
#Singular regular oblique case
NounCountryBase|NounCountryUnreducible  [<np><top>:] NouNinflBoundary NSg0 CaseRegOblique (Def|Poss)? 
NounCountryBase|NounCountryUnreducible  [<np><top>:] NouNinflBoundaryRed NSg0 CaseRegOblique (Def|Poss)?  # Dir/LR



#Plural անգլիաներ
NounCountryBase|NounCountryUnreducible [<np><top>:]  NouNinflBoundary NPlReg CaseRegU? (Def|Poss)? 
#regularized plural possessive տուներնիս
NounCountryBase|NounCountryUnreducible  [<np><top>:] NouNinflBoundary NSg0|NPlReg  PossPl CaseRegPostPluralPoss? Def|Poss
NounCountryBase|NounCountryUnreducible  [<np><top>:] NouNinflBoundary NSg0|NPlReg  InsReg PossPl  Def|Poss


#attributive, i assume no ablaut in the attributive
NounCountryBase|NounCountryUnreducible  [<np><top>:] NouNinflBoundary NSg0 AttributiveGenIDef|AttributiveInst 
NounCountryBase|NounCountryUnreducible [<np><top>:]  NouNinflBoundary NPlReg AttributiveGenUDef|AttributiveInst 
